Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-157
Hearing; order; requirements.

Any hearing held pursuant to section 75-156 shall be held pursuant to rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the Public Service Commission. Every decision and order rendered by the commission after the hearing is held shall be in writing and accompanied by findings of facts and conclusions of law. The decision or order shall be sent to the parties by certified or registered mail.

Laws 1995, LB 424, § 19.